District of Columbia statutes.
47-827

Class actions.

Within 1 year after September 3, 1974, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall establish a method which it deems appropriate by which class action cases regarding any matter relating to real and personal property taxes may be brought before the Superior Court.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1057, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 428
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-827.
1973 Ed., § 47-648.